District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.15

Sale or purchase of parts prohibited.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person that, for valuable consideration, knowingly purchases or sells a part for transplantation, therapy, research, education, or any other purpose, if removal of a part from an individual is intended to occur after the individual’s death, commits a felony and upon conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $50,000, imprisonment not exceeding 5 years, or both.

(b)

A person may charge a reasonable amount for the removal, processing, preservation, quality control, storage, transportation, implantation, or disposal of a part.

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 16, 55 DCR 2532
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 16 of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (2006).